src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON мс-п_тот-то
+Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:о́т-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:о́т-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:ого́-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ого́-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́м-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ому́-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:е́м-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:о́-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:о́-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ого́-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́м-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ому́-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:е́м-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:а́-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:у́-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:о́й-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́й-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:о́й-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:о́й-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:о́ю-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:е́-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:е́-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:е́х-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:е́х-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:е́х-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:е́м-то # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:е́ми-то # ;
+Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:о́т-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:о́т-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:ого́-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ого́-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́м-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ому́-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:е́м-то # ;
+Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:о́-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:о́-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ого́-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́м-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ому́-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:е́м-то # ;
+Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:а́-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:у́-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:о́й-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:о́й-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:о́й-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:о́й-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:о́ю-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:е́-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:е́-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:е́х-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:е́х-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:е́х-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:е́м-то # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:е́ми-то # ;

LEXICON мс-п_этот
+Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:от # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:от # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:ого # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ого # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:ом # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ому # ;
! +Det+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:им # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:о # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:о # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ого # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:ом # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ому # ;
! +Det+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:им # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:а # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:у # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ой # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:ой # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ой # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:ой # ;
! +Det+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:ою # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:и # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:и # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:их # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:их # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:их # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:им # ;
! +Det+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:ими # ;
+Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:от # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:от # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:ого # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ого # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:ом # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ому # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:им # ;
+Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:о # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:о # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ого # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:ом # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ому # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:им # ;
+Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:а # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:у # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ой # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:ой # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ой # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:ой # ;
! +Pron+Dem+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:ою # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:и # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:и # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:их # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:их # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:их # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:им # ;
! +Pron+Dem+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:ими # ;

LEXICON RelPron_мс-п_[п_a]
+Pron+Rel: LF_stem ;

LEXICON Interr_мс-п_[п_a]
+Det+Interr: LF_stem ;
!+Pron+Interr: LF_stem ; ! TODO Can который or каковский be interrogative pronouns?

LEXICON Rel_мс-п_[п_a]
+Det+Rel: LF_stem ;
+Det+Rel: LF_stem ;
!+Pron+Rel: LF_stem ; ! TODO Can каковский be a relative pronoun?
!+Pron+Rel: LF_stem ;

LEXICON Indef_мс-п_[п_a]
+Det+Indef: LF_stem ;
+Pron+Indef: LF_stem ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_a]
+Det: LF_stem ;
+Pron: LF_stem ; ! TODO Can all of these be pronouns? 

LEXICON мс-п_[п_a]-либо
+Det+Indef: LF_stem-либо ;
+Pron+Indef: LF_stem-либо ; ! TODO Can these be pronouns? 

LEXICON мс-п_[п_a]-нибудь
+Det+Indef: LF_stem-нибудь ;
+Pron+Indef: LF_stem-нибудь ; ! TODO Can these be pronouns? 

LEXICON мс-п_[п_a]-то
+Det+Def: LF_stem-то ;
+Pron+Def: LF_stem-то ; ! TODO Can these be pronouns? 

! LEXICON мс-п_[п_a]_Pl ! TODO Can these be pronouns?
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ые # ;
! +Det+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ые # ;
! +Det+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ые # ;
! +Pron+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ые # ;
! +Pron+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_a]_некий ! TODO Can this be a pronoun?
+Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:ий # ;
! +Det+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:ий # ;
! +Det+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:оего # ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:оего # ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:оем # ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:оему # ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:им # ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:оим # ; ! устар. TODO
+Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:ое # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:ое # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:оего # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:оем # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:оему # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:им # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:оим # ; ! устар.
+Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:ая # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:ую # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ой # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:оей # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:ой # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc+Use/NG:оей # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ой # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat+Use/NG:оей # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:ой # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:ою # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:оей # ;
! +Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:оею # ;
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:ие # ;
! +Det+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:ие # ;
! +Det+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:их # ;
! +Det+Anim+Pl+Acc:оих # ; ! устар.
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:их # ;
! +Det+Pl+Gen:оих # ; ! устар.
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:их # ;
! +Det+Pl+Loc:оих # ; ! устар.
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:им # ;
! +Det+Pl+Dat:оим # ; ! устар.
! +Det+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:ими # ;
! +Det+Pl+Ins:оими # ; ! устар.
+Pron+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:ий # ;
! +Pron+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:ий # ;
! +Pron+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:оего # ;
! +Pron+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:оего # ;
! +Pron+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:оем # ;
! +Pron+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:оему # ;
! +Pron+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:им # ;
! +Pron+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:оим # ; ! устар. TODO
+Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:ое # ;
! +Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:ое # ;
! +Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:оего # ;
! +Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:оем # ;
! +Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:оему # ;
! +Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:им # ;
! +Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:оим # ; ! устар.
+Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:ая # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:ую # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:ой # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:оей # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:ой # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc+Use/NG:оей # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:ой # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat+Use/NG:оей # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:ой # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:ою # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:оей # ;
! +Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:оею # ;
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:ие # ;
! +Pron+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:ие # ;
! +Pron+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:их # ;
! +Pron+Anim+Pl+Acc:оих # ; ! устар.
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:их # ;
! +Pron+Pl+Gen:оих # ; ! устар.
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:их # ;
! +Pron+Pl+Loc:оих # ; ! устар.
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:им # ;
! +Pron+Pl+Dat:оим # ; ! устар.
! +Pron+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:ими # ;
! +Pron+Pl+Ins:оими # ; ! устар.

LEXICON мс-п_[п_a]_экий ! TODO Can these be pronouns?
+Det: LF_stem ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:оего # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:оего # ;
! +Det+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:оему # ;
! +Det+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:оему # ;
+Det+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:а # ;
+Pron: LF_stem ;
! +Pron+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:оего # ;
! +Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:оего # ;
! +Pron+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:оему # ;
! +Pron+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:оему # ;
+Pron+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:а # ;

LEXICON Interr_мс-п_[п_b]
+Det+Interr: LF_end ;
+Pron+Interr: LF_end ;

LEXICON Rel_мс-п_[п_b]
+Det+Rel: LF_end ;
!+Pron+Rel: LF_end ; # Can каковой be a relative pronoun?

LEXICON мс-п_[п_b]
+Det: LF_end ;
+Pron: LF_end ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_b]_ни
+Det+Neg: LF_end ;
+Pron+Neg: LF_end ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_b]-либо
+Det+Indef: LF_end-либо ;
+Pron+Indef: LF_end-либо ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_b]-нибудь
+Det+Indef: LF_end-нибудь ;
+Pron+Indef: LF_end-нибудь ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_b]-то
+Det+Def: LF_end-то ;
+Pron+Def: LF_end-то ;

LEXICON Dem_мс-п_[п_b]-то
+Det+Dem: LF_end-то ;
+Pron+Dem: LF_end-то ;

LEXICON мс_кто ! TODO FIX How to tag animacy for кто что and derivatives
+Pron+Interr: мс_кто_Nom ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_кто_Acc ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_кто_Gen ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_кто_Loc ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_кто_Dat ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_кто_Ins ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_кто_Nom ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_кто_Acc ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_кто_Gen ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_кто_Loc ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_кто_Dat ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_кто_Ins ;

LEXICON мс_кто_ни ! TODO FIX How to tag animacy for кто что and derivatives
+Pron+Neg: мс_кто_Nom ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_кто_Acc ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_кто_Gen ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_кто_Loc ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_кто_Dat ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_кто_Ins ;

LEXICON мс_кто_Nom
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom:кто́ # ;
+Fem+Anim+Sg+Nom:кто́ # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Nom:кто́ # ;
! LEXICON мс_кто_Acc
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:кого́ # ;
! LEXICON мс_кто_Gen
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen:кого́ # ;
! LEXICON мс_кто_Loc
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc:ко́м # ;
! LEXICON мс_кто_Dat
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat:кому́ # ;
! LEXICON мс_кто_Ins
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins:ке́м # ;

LEXICON мс_кто-либо
+Pron+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom:кто́-либо # ;
+Pron+Indef+Fem+Anim+Sg+Nom:кто́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+Anim+Pl+Nom:кто́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:кого́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen:кого́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc:ко́м-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat:кому́-либо # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins:ке́м-либо # ;

LEXICON мс_кто-нибудь
+Pron+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom:кто́-нибудь # ;
+Pron+Indef+Fem+Anim+Sg+Nom:кто́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+MFN+Anim+Pl+Nom:кто́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:кого́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen:кого́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc:ко́м-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat:кому́-нибудь # ;
! +Pron+Indef+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins:ке́м-нибудь # ;

LEXICON мс_кто-то
+Pron+Def+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom:кто́-то # ;
+Pron+Def+Fem+Anim+Sg+Nom:кто́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+MFN+Anim+Pl+Nom:кто́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:кого́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen:кого́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc:ко́м-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat:кому́-то # ;
! +Pron+Def+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins:ке́м-то # ;

LEXICON мс_некто
+Pron+Def+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom: # ; ! TODO FIX what about Fem, Pl?

LEXICON мс_некого ! TODO FIX tag order (especially Pred)
+Pron+Pred+Msc+Anim+Sg: мс_некого_Acc ;
+Pron+Pred+Msc+Anim+Sg: мс_некого_Gen ;
+Pron+Pred+Msc+Anim+Sg: мс_некого_Loc ;
+Pron+Pred+Msc+Anim+Sg: мс_некого_Dat ;
+Pron+Pred+Msc+Anim+Sg: мс_некого_Ins ;

! LEXICON мс_некого_Acc
! +Acc:кого # ;

! LEXICON мс_некого_Gen
! +Gen:кого # ;

! LEXICON мс_некого_Loc
! +Loc:ком # ;

! LEXICON мс_некого_Dat
! +Dat:кому # ;

! LEXICON мс_некого_Ins
! +Ins:кем # ;

LEXICON мс_что
+Pron+Interr: мс_что_Nom ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_что_Acc ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_что_Gen ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_что_Loc ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_что_Dat ;
+Pron+Interr: мс_что_Ins ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_что_Nom ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_что_Acc ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_что_Gen ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_что_Loc ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_что_Dat ;
+Pron+Rel: мс_что_Ins ;

LEXICON мс_что_ни
+Pron+Neg: мс_что_Nom ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_что_Acc ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_что_Gen ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_что_Loc ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_что_Dat ;
+Pron+Neg: мс_что_Ins ;
